District of Columbia statutes.
1-145

Notice to commercial property owners.

The Department of Finance and Revenue shall give notice of the provisions of this subchapter in each real property tax bill sent to commercial property owners in the next mailing immediately following July 1, 1982.

History

July 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-121, § 6, 29 DCR 2072

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-125.

References in Text

Pursuant to the Office of the Chief Financial Officer’s “Notice of Public Interest” published in the April 18, 1997, issue of the District of Columbia Register ( 44 DCR 2345) the Office of Tax and Revenue assumed all of the duties and functions previously performed by the Department of Finance and Revenue, as set forth in Commissioner’s Order 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. This action was made effective January 22, 1997, nunc pro tunc.